Wyoming, session 2025, HB0174.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-8-104(b)(ii) and (aa) is amended to
read:

6-8-104. Wearing or carrying concealed weapons;
penalties; exceptions; permits.

HB0174

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0407
(b) The attorney general is authorized to issue
permits to carry a concealed firearm to persons qualified
as provided by this subsection. The attorney general shall
promulgate rules necessary to carry out this section no
later than October 1, 1994. Applications for a permit to
carry a concealed firearm shall be made available and
distributed by the division of criminal investigation and
local law enforcement agencies. The permit shall be valid
throughout the state for a period of five (5) years from
the date of issuance. The permittee shall carry the permit,
together with valid identification at all times when the
permittee is carrying a concealed firearm and shall display
both the permit and proper identification upon request of
any peace officer. The attorney general through the
division shall issue a permit to any person who:

(ii) Is at least twenty-one (21) eighteen (18)
years of age;

(aa) Notwithstanding the provisions of W.S. 1-39-105
through 1-39-112, the attorney general and members of the
division of criminal investigation are immune from personal
liability for issuing, for failing to issue and for
HB0174

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0407
revoking any concealed firearms permit under this section.
A sheriff, police chief, employee of a sheriff or police
chief's office shall not be personally liable for damages
in a civil action arising from any information submitted
pursuant to subsections (g) through (j) and (h) of this
section. Nothing in this section shall relieve any
governmental entity of any liability pursuant to W.S.
1-39-101 through 1-39-120.

Section 2. W.S. 6-8-104(j) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0174